Hawaii statutes.
§171-5 Meetings, regular, special; quorum.
Regular meetings of the board of land and natural resources shall be held not
less than once a month and the board shall provide in its rules and regulations
the number and dates for the regular meetings. Special meetings may be called
by the chairperson at any time by giving notice thereof to each member present
in the State at least five days prior to the date of the special meeting;
provided that notice shall not be required if all members present in the State
agree and sign a written waiver of the notice.

However, no final action involving disposition
of public lands may be had at such special meeting.

Any action taken by the board shall be by a
simple majority of the members of the board; provided that a simple majority of
the members present at a meeting and qualified to vote shall be required to
allow any decision pursuant to section 183C-6(b). Four members of the board
shall constitute a quorum to do business. The board shall keep accurate
records and minutes of all meetings, special and regular, and they shall be
public records. Copies of portions of the agenda relating to dispositions of
land shall be made available to the public in the land office of each district
at least three days before the meeting at which the matter will be discussed or
voted upon. [L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-5; HRS §171-5; gen ch 1993; am
L 2001, c 215, §3]

Cross References

Meetings and records, see chapter 92.

Case Notes

A quorum of the board is sufficient to conduct business, but
any board action must be authorized by a majority of the total membership of
the board (pre-2001 amendment). 102 H. 257, 75 P.3d 160.

Where a majority of the board (pre-2001 amendment) did not
affirmatively approve or disapprove of electric company's application to
modernize and expand electric generating station on conservation land within
the time established, the board failed to render a "decision" so as
to avoid the 180-day default mechanism of §183-41; thus, electric company was
allowed to subject land to the use applied for. 102 H. 257, 75 P.3d 160.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next